Georgia, session 2025_26, HB542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Protecting All Learners Act."
SECTION 2.
Article 2 of Chapter 2B of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
promise scholarship accounts, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
H. B. 542
- 1 -

LC 49 2142
"20-2B-23.1.
Notwithstanding any provision of Code Section 20-2B-23 or any other provision of law to
the contrary, each participating school shall:
(1) Fully implement the most recent Individualized Education Program plan or Section
504 plan for each student enrolled in such participating school who is the subject of such
plan;
(2) Comply to the fullest extent possible with the federal Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act and Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973; and
(3) Adopt rules and policies to implement the provisions of this Code section, including,
but not limited to, rules and policies requiring parents of participating students to provide
the participating school with a complete copy of their child's most recent Individualized
Education Program plan or Section 504 plan within ten days of enrollment in such
participating school."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 542
- 2 -